Georgia, session 2025_26, HB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 5 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to ad valorem
taxation of property, is amended in Code Section 48-5-2, relating to definitions regarding
such taxation, by revising paragraph (1) as follows:
"(1) 'Current use value' of bona fide conservation use property means the amount a
knowledgeable buyer would pay for the property with the intention of continuing the
property in its existing use and in an arm's length, bona fide sale and shall be determined
in accordance with the specifications and criteria provided for in subsection (b) of Code
Section 48-5-269."
H. B. 282
- 1 -

LC 50 1019
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 282
- 2 -